Montana, session 2025, HB876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Sawmill revitalization special revenue account. (1) There is a sawmill revitalization
special revenue account within the state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102.
(2) Before June 30, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer $6 million from the big sky economic
development fund to the sawmill revitalization account.
(3)(2) The board of investments shall administer money deposited in the account in accordance with
the Montana In-State Investment Act, Title 17, chapter 6, part 3.
(4)(3) The board shall make loans at an interest rate not to exceed 3% 4% from this account to
parties with the capacity to revitalize a closed sawmill and return it to commercial operation, with:
(a) first priority given to an applicant wishing to revitalize a sawmill closed during the 12 months
preceding January 1, 2025; and
(b) second priority given to an applicant wishing to revitalize a sawmill closed more than 12 months
but less than 36 months before January 1, 2025.
Section 2. Transfer of funds. By June 30, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer $6 million from the
capital developments long-range building program account established in 17-7-209 to the sawmill revitalization
special revenue account provided for in [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 876
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 876
Section 3. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $6 million from the sawmill revitalization account
in [section 1] to the board of investments for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, to provide loans to parties
with the capacity to revitalize a closed sawmill and return it to commercial operation pursuant to [this act].
(2) Money from this appropriation that is not spent during the biennium must revert to the capital
developments long-range building program account.
Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
90, chapter 1, and the provisions of Title 90, chapter 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 6. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 876
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 876, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 876
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK, C. KEOGH
AN ACT CREATING THE SAWMILL REVITALIZATION SPECIAL REVENUE ACCOUNT; AUTHORIZING THE
BOARD OF INVESTMENTS TO PROVIDE LOANS TO PARTIES; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION;
PROVIDING FOR A FUND TRANSFER; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A
TERMINATION DATE.”